Maine, session 132, LD681.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §10018 is enacted to read:
§10018. Mandated legislative appropriations for Maine Maritime Academy
Beginning in fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Legislature shall
increase the percentage of the Maine Maritime Academy's total state appropriation as a
share of its total operating costs by 5% until the percentage of the total state appropriation
as a share of the Maine Maritime Academy's total operating costs equals at least the lesser
of:
1. University of Maine System appropriations. The percentage of the University of
Maine System's total state appropriation as a share of its total operating costs; and
2. Maine Community College System appropriations. The percentage of the Maine
Community College System's total state appropriation as a share of its total operating costs.
Beginning in 2025, the University of Maine System, the Maine Community College
System and the Maine Maritime Academy shall each submit to the Governor and to the
Legislature a report by December 1st annually that contains its most recent total operating
costs.
Sec. 2. Commission established. The Commission to Study the Funding of Public
Institutions of Higher Education, referred to in this section as "the commission," is
established.
1. Notwithstanding Joint Rule 353, the commission consists of 15 members, including:
A. Two members of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate, who serve
on the Joint Standing Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs, including one
member of the party holding the largest number of seats in the Legislature and one
member of the party holding the 2nd largest number of seats in the Legislature;
B. Three members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the
House, who serve on the Joint Standing Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs,
including 2 members of the party holding the largest number of seats in the Legislature
and one member of the party holding the 2nd largest number of seats in the Legislature;
C. One member with expertise in higher education policy issues representing a
statewide education policy research institute, appointed by the President of the Senate;
D. One member representing the certification and higher education committee of the
State Board of Education, appointed by the President of the Senate;
E. One member who is a representative of a union representing the faculty of the Maine
Community College System, appointed by the President of the Senate;
F. One member who is a representative of a union representing the faculty of the
University of Maine System, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
G. One member who is a representative of a union representing the faculty of the
Maine Maritime Academy, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
H. One member who is currently enrolled as a student at a public college or university
in the State, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
Page 1 - 132LR1824(01)

I. The Chancellor of the University of Maine System or the chancellor's designee;
J. The President of the Maine Community College System or the president's designee;
K. The President of the Maine Maritime Academy or the president's designee; and
L. The Commissioner of Education or the commissioner's designee.
In appointing members of the commission, the appointing authorities shall give
consideration to race, gender, socioeconomic diversity and geographic diversity.
2. The first-named Senate member is the Senate chair and the first-named House of
Representatives member is the House chair of the commission.
3. All appointments must be made no later than 30 days following the effective date of
this Act. The appointing authorities shall notify the Executive Director of the Legislative
Council once all appointments have been completed. After appointment of all members,
the chairs shall call and convene the first meeting of the commission. If 30 days or more
after the effective date of this Act a majority of but not all appointments have been made,
the chairs may request authority and the Legislative Council may grant authority for the
commission to meet and conduct its business.
4. The commission shall review all related laws and rules addressing the State’s public
policy on higher education, including but not limited to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
20-A, section 10902, and the methods and mechanisms by which public higher education
institutions in the State are funded and make recommendations for potential legislative
changes.
In conducting its review, the commission shall analyze present and future goals, including
but not limited to expanding access to affordable high-quality higher education to help
students achieve postsecondary success in the 21st century. The commission shall also
analyze present and past funding methods and mechanisms used in the State to determine
the State's portion of funding for the University of Maine System, the Maine Community
College System and the Maine Maritime Academy, as well as funding mechanisms used
by other states to fund public higher education.
To assist the commission in carrying out its review, the Department of Education, the
University of Maine System, the Maine Community College System and the Maine
Maritime Academy each shall provide to the commission any data and information the
commission requests and considers relevant to its work.
At the discretion of the chairs, the commission may seek input from students, faculty and
staff in the State's public institutions of higher education, groups that have an interest in the
State's public institutions of higher education and other stakeholders.
5. The Legislative Council shall provide necessary staffing services to the commission,
except that Legislative Council staff support is not authorized when the Legislature is in
regular or special session.
6. No later than December 3, 2025, the commission shall submit a report that includes
its findings and recommendations, including suggested legislation, to the Joint Standing
Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs. The joint standing committee may report
out a bill related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Page 2 - 132LR1824(01)